Missouri, session 2026, HB1744.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 161.020, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 161.020, to read as follows:
161.020. 1. There is hereby created a department of elementary and secondary
education headed by a state board of education as provided in Article IX, Constitution of
Missouri, and chapter 161 and others. The state board shall appoint a commissioner of
education as the chief administrative officer of the department.
2. The department of education, chapter 161 and others, is abolished and its powers,
duties, personnel and property are transferred as provided in this act.
3. The division of public schools of the department of education, chapter 161 and
others, is abolished and its powers, duties, personnel and property, with exceptions specified
elsewhere in this act, are transferred by type I transfer to the department of elementary and
secondary education.
4. The Missouri School for the Deaf, chapter 178 and others, and the Missouri School
for the Blind, chapter 178 and others, are transferred to the department of elementary and
secondary education by a type I transfer. The commissioner of education shall appoint
superintendents for these schools and members of the advisory boards, provided in chapter
178 and others.
5. (1) As used in this subsection, the following terms mean:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1744 2
(a) "Committee", the quality control committee for oversight established in this
subsection;
(b) "Department", the Missouri department of elementary and secondary
education;
(c) "Educational entity", any of the following:
a. A charter school as described in section 160.400;
b. An entity that provides early childhood education services as defined in
section 161.244;
c. An FPE school as defined in section 167.013;
d. A home school as defined in section 167.012;
e. A private school;
f. A public or private virtual school;
g. A public school as defined in section 160.011; or
h. A school district as defined in section 160.011;
(d) "Key performance indicators" or "KPI", the indicators of success in the
accomplishment of the department's mission as assessed and reported on by the
committee, which indicators include, but are not limited to, a graduated student's ability
to:
a. Show up on time;
b. Be respectful and kind;
c. Follow instructions;
d. Work hard;
e. Demonstrate initiative; and
f. Demonstrate discernment.
(2) (a) The mission of the department is hereby declared to be to produce
graduates who contribute positively to the economy and their communities.
(b) The department's mission shall apply to all educational entities. Each
educational entity shall demonstrate how the department's mission is reinforced in the
educational entity's curricula and graduation requirements.
(c) The department's mission shall be incorporated into and throughout existing
curricula.
(d) Each educational entity that is a high school shall ensure that each
graduating student meets all KPIs before granting such student's diploma or high
school equivalency (HSE) certificate.
(3) The department shall have the following duties in connection with this
subsection:

HB 1744 3
(a) Developing processes for use by educational entities to meet obligations
under this section and committee requirements;
(b) Implementing quality control systems and methods as defined, designed, or
directed by the committee;
(c) Establishing policies and procedures for program or project implementation
and monitoring, which shall be reported to the committee;
(d) Ensuring graduates meet standards established by the committee;
(e) Maintaining accountability for failure of graduates to meet standards
established by the committee; and
(f) Ensuring that each educational entity that provides early childhood
education services demonstrates inclusion of the KPIs in curricula and graduation
requirements.
(4) (a) There is hereby established in the office of the secretary of state the
"Quality Control Committee for Oversight".
(b) The membership of the committee shall be composed of a senior employee or
member from each of the following:
a. The Missouri department of elementary and secondary education;
b. The Missouri department of higher education and workforce development;
c. The Missouri department of labor and industrial relations;
d. The Missouri department of the National Guard;
e. The Missouri department of commerce and insurance;
f. The Missouri department of social services;
g. The Missouri department of corrections;
h. A state representative appointed by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
i. A state senator appointed by the president pro tempore of the senate.
(c) Each member of the committee shall serve a term of four years.
(d) The members of the committee shall select one of the committee members as
the chair of the committee. The chair shall be selected for a four-year term. The
position of chair of the committee shall be a full-time position. The member
representing the department, the state department of corrections, or the state
department of social services shall not be eligible to be the chair. The members shall
receive no additional compensation for performing duties required of such member's
position on the committee but shall be reimbursed for attending meetings with a per
diem amount as determined by the department and a travel fee not to exceed the
approved federal mileage rate.
(e) The committee shall hold meetings as determined by the committee.

HB 1744 4
(f) The committee may establish a working group or team to assist the committee
in carrying out the committee's duties. The members of such team may be full-time
employees of the committee.
(g) The committee shall have the following duties:
a. To define:
(i) Outcome goals, objectives, and standards;
(ii) Means and methods for collecting outcome metrics; and
(iii) Reporting requirements and improvement recommendations;
b. To maintain any adopted standards, means, methods, reports, and
recommendations as public information;
100 c. To establish quality control test requirements including, but not limited to:
101 (i) Determining the method by which success will be measured;
102 (ii) Establishing target standards or metrics to be used in determining the
103 success or failure of department programs implemented by each educational entity; and
104 (iii) Establishing a post-graduation validation of the effectiveness of each
105 educational entity that is a high school, as determined by graduate participation in the
106 economy and community, which validation means, metrics, and methods shall include
107 any and all payroll, state benefits, federal benefits, post-elementary and -secondary
108 education participation, and state department of corrections data as deemed necessary
109 or sufficient by the committee;
110 d. To implement an accessible system by which employers can report employee
111 performance as it relates to the KPIs and that state departments may use in determining
112 benefits eligibility; and
113 e. As each of the following applies to the department's mission and to the KPIs:
114 (i) To direct department programs, projects, or activities responsible for quality
115 control systems and methods;
116 (ii) To establish policies and procedures for examining each course offered by an
117 educational entity, for presenting to a school board a defense of such course in relation
118 to the course's objectives and the department's mission, and for approving such course
119 by the school board to which the course is defended;
120 (iii) To adjudicate challenges to school board rulings on courses offered and
121 approved by the school board;
122 (iv) To initiate challenges to courses offered or actions taken by educational
123 entities; and
124 (v) To establish policies and procedures for assigning responsibility for a
125 student's postgraduate outcomes to educational entities that grant a diploma or a high
126 school equivalency (HSE) certificate, as determined by the committee.

HB 1744 5
127 (5) The secretary of state shall:
128 (a) Hold the department accountable for graduates who fail to meet the KPIs
129 during high school and within five years after graduation;
130 (b) Hold the department and school districts or entities accountable for
131 individuals who fail to graduate on schedule or who fail to meet the KPIs; and
132 (c) Hold parents accountable for students who are a repeated disruption to the
133 learning environment.
134 (6) Subject to appropriation, moneys allocated for diversity, equity, and
135 inclusion programs or other similar programs shall be available after the termination of
136 such programs only in such amounts necessary to cover the costs of implementing and
137 administering this subsection.
✔